Alabama, session 2026rs, HB659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Bill of Rights in the Classroom Act.
Section 2. The Legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) The first 10 amendments to the United States
Constitution, commonly known as the Bill of Rights, enshrine
fundamental protections of individual liberty and limit the
powers of government.
(2) Civic literacy is essential to the preservation of
constitutional self government.
(3) Displaying the Bill of Rights in public school
classrooms serves an educational purpose and reinforces shared
civic principles.
Section 3. For purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) BILL OF RIGHTS. The first 10 amendments to the
Constitution of the United States as ratified in 1791.
(2) CLASSROOM. Any room in which public school students
receive regular instructional services.
Page 2

receive regular instructional services.
HB659 INTRODUCED
(3) DEPARTMENT. The State Department of Education.
(4) PARENT. A parent or legal guardian of a student
enrolled in a public school.
(5) PUBLIC SCHOOL. Any elementary or secondary school
operated by a public school district or chartered under state
law.
Section 4. (a) On or before January 1, 2027, the
department shall publish a standardized version of the Bill of
Rights for use by local boards of education, which shall
include the full and accurate text of the Bill of Rights.
(b) The text shall consist solely of the official
language of the Bill of Rights without additional commentary,
interpretation, or partisan material.
(c) The department shall make the standardized text
available in printable electronic format at no cost to local
boards of education.
Section 5. Before the 2027-2028 school year, each local
board of education shall post the text of the standardized
version of the Bill of Rights, as published by the department
pursuant to Section 4, in a prominent location on its official
website.
Section 6. (a) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school
year, each local board of education shall display the
standardized version of the Bill of Rights, pursuant to
Section 4, on a poster or framed document in all public school
classrooms.
(b) The poster or framed document required by
subsection (a) shall:
Page 3

subsection (a) shall:
HB659 INTRODUCED
(1) Consist solely of the text of the standardized
version of the Bill of Rights, as published by the department
pursuant to Section 4;
(2) Be of sufficient size and clarity to be readable by
students in the classroom; and
(3) Be conspicuously displayed in each classroom.
Section 7. (a) A parent may provide written notice to
the local superintendent of education alleging noncompliance
with this act.
(b) If the local board of education fails to cure the
alleged violation within 30 days after receipt of notice, the
parent may bring an action for declaratory and injunctive
relief in a court of competent jurisdiction.
(c) A prevailing plaintiff may be awarded reasonable
attorney fees and costs.
100 Section 8. This act shall become effective on October
101 1, 2026.
Page 4